Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,166
Certification to federal court; stay of proceedings.

The district court of the county in Nebraska in which said State Capitol is located shall, when such suit is brought, grant a stay of proceedings to any state officer or officers under such statute or order, pending the determination of such suit by the courts of the State of Nebraska. The district court of the county in Nebraska in which its State Capitol is located shall upon the institution of said suit, certify forthwith to the United States District Court, District of Nebraska, to its proper Division in which such action heretofore has been brought, the fact that such suit has been begun in the district court of the county in the state where the State Capitol is located.

Laws 1929, c. 79, § 2, p. 269;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,157;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,166.